Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.880

[Art. 145] Delegation of authority by the governor.

The governor may delegate any authority vested in him or her under this code, and may provide for the subdelegation of any such authority, except the power given him or her by RCW 38.38.192 and 38.38.240.

[ 2011 c 336 s 788; 1963 c 220 s 130.]